Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB687.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 259.120 is amended to read as follows:
Stray equines and stray cattle shall be taken up and posted in the following manner:
(1) (a) Documentation of stray equines shall be taken before a county
judge/executive of the district, who shall administer to the taker-up an oath, in
substance, that the equine was taken up by him or her as a stray and that he or
she has not defaced or altered the marks, brands, or other identifiers,
including but not limited to microchips or freeze brands, of the equine.
(b) Documentation of stray cattle shall be taken before a county judge/executive
of the district, who shall administer to the taker-up an oath, in substance that
the cattle were taken by him or her as strays on his or her premises within the
preceding ten (10) days and that he or she has not defaced or altered the
marks or brands of the cattle.
(c) Duties of the county judge/executive pertaining to stray equines shall be to:
1. Contract with a licensed veterinarian, who shall document the stray
equine's breed, color, sex, marks, brands, scars, and other distinguishing
features, perform a microchip scan, and identify the existence of lip
tattoos, freeze brands, or microchips;
2. Record the veterinarian's findings, the name and residence of the taker-
up, and the location of the stray equine in a book to be kept by him or
her for that purpose;
3. Maintain documentation in electronic and paper format; and
4. Send a copy of the documentation of the stray equine to the Office of
[the ]State Veterinarian, who shall post notification on the Office of [the
]State Veterinarian's website[Web site]. The Office of[ the] State
Veterinarian shall post one (1) photograph of the stray equine's front
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/18/2026 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2229
view, including its head and feet, and one (1) photograph of the stray
equine's side view from muzzle to tail.[;
]
(d) The county judge/executive:
1. May contract, subject to approval by the county fiscal court, with a
person or organization that provides animal sheltering services to
perform those duties listed under this subsection and subsection (2) of
this section in lieu of the county judge/executive; and
2. Shall be immune from criminal and civil liability under KRS 259.140
for any act related to the taking up and posting of stray equines;
(2) The county judge/executive shall give to the taker-up a copy of the documentation
for the record and immediately deliver to the county clerk a certified copy of the
same record;
(3) The clerk shall immediately record the stray certificate of the county
judge/executive as provided by the taker-up in a book to be kept by him or her for
that purpose;
(4) The taker-up shall immediately post a copy of the county judge/executive's
certificate in the sheriff's office with jurisdiction over the area where the stray cattle
or stray equine was taken up after he or she has posted the stray. Hold time for stray
equines shall begin after all documentation has been properly filed and posted by
the county judge/executive and taker-up; and
(5) (a) If ownership is found from identifiers of the stray equine such as lip tattoos,
freeze brands, or microchips, efforts shall be made by the county/judge
executive or his or her designee to ascertain the owner by investigatory due
diligence in locating the owner and providing notice before holding time
expires. The owner/claimants of the stray equine shall reimburse the county
judge/executive for the cost of the veterinarian's assessment per the contracted
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/18/2026 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2229
agreement.
(b) The taker-up shall be paid by the owner of the stray, if and when he or she
claims the stray or its value, the actual itemized costs incurred by the taker-up
for keeping the stray equine or cattle. In the event that a dispute arises relating
to ownership, adverse claimants, third-party claims or liens, value of the
equine, or actual itemized expenses incurred, the parties may file an action in
a court of competent jurisdiction of the county in which the stray equine was
taken up. The filing of an action under this paragraph shall toll holding time
as to vesting of ownership interests.
(c) The taker-up may have the stray equine sterilized only after the fifteen (15)
day holding period has expired and ownership vested pursuant to KRS
259.130, and any pending court cases pertaining to the stray equine have been
resolved.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/18/2026 3:51 PM Jacketed